Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.315

Forms and procedures—Filing of financial statement—Publications—Fee.

(1) The secretary may establish, by rule, standard forms and procedures for the efficient administration of this chapter.

(2) The secretary may provide by rule for the filing of a financial statement by registered entities.

(3) The secretary may issue such publications, reports, or information from the records as may be useful to the solicited public and charitable organizations. To defray the costs of any such publication, the secretary is authorized to charge a reasonable fee to cover the costs of preparing, printing, and distributing such publications, in accordance with RCW 43.07.130.

[ 2011 c 199 s 24; 1993 c 471 s 17; 1983 c 265 s 17.]